Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6136YC (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 279.89 relating to prohibitions 4 regarding mobile libraries and agreements with public libraries 5 in the same manner as a school district. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0q. Be subject to and comply with the 9 requirements of section 279.89 relating to prohibitions 10 regarding mobile libraries and agreements with public libraries 11 in the same manner as a school district. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Prohibitions ââ public 13 libraries. 14 1. As used in this section: 15 a. âMobile libraryâ means a motor vehicle that is owned 16 or operated by a public library and that is used to transport 17 books and other educational materials. 18 b. âPublic libraryâ means all of the following: 19 (1) A library established by city ordinance. 20 (2) A library district as provided in chapter 336. 21 2. The board of directors of a school district shall not do 22 any of the following: 23 a. Enter into any agreement with a public library that 24 allows students enrolled in the school district to utilize 25 identification cards issued by the school district to access 26 any books, electronic resources, or other educational materials 27 at the public library. 28 b. Allow a mobile library to access school district property 29 for purposes of hosting or participating in an event that 30 allows students enrolled in the school district to check out 31 books from the mobile library. 32